Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3533
Delivery and receipt of radiological instruments.

The responsible agency shall be responsible for delivery and receipt of radiological instruments to and from the department.

Laws 2006, LB 787, § 5.